Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.090

Gambling commission—Reports.

Subject to RCW 40.07.040, the commission shall, from time to time, make reports to the governor and the legislature covering such matters in connection with this chapter as the governor and the legislature may require. These reports shall be public documents and contain such general information and remarks as the commission deems pertinent thereto and any information requested by either the governor or members of the legislature: PROVIDED, That the commission appointed pursuant to RCW 9.46.040 may conduct a thorough study of the types of gambling activity permitted and the types of gambling activity prohibited by this chapter and may make recommendations to the legislature as to: (1) Gambling activity that ought to be permitted; (2) gambling activity that ought to be prohibited; (3) the types of licenses and permits that ought to be required; (4) the type and amount of tax that ought to be applied to each type of permitted gambling activity; (5) any changes which may be made to the law of this state which further the purposes and policies set forth in RCW 9.46.010 as now law or hereafter amended; and (6) any other matter that the commission may deem appropriate. However, no later than December 1st of the year following any authorization by the legislature of a new gambling activity, any report by the commission to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature must include information on the state of the gambling industry both within the state and nationwide. Members of the commission and its staff may contact the legislature, or any of its members, at any time, to advise it of recommendations of the commission.

[ 2020 c 127 s 12; 1987 c 505 s 3; 1981 c 139 s 7; 1977 c 75 s 4; 1975 1st ex.s. c 166 s 4; 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 9.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2020 c 127: See notes following RCW 9.46.0364.

Severability—1981 c 139: See note following RCW 9.46.070.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 166: "If any provision of this 1975 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1975 1st ex.s. c 166 s 15.]